Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1223
Examinations; requirements; fee; hardship licensing.

(1) Examinations for water well monitoring technicians shall be designed and adopted to examine the knowledge of the applicant regarding the minimum standards for water wells and water well pumps, the geological characteristics of the state, measuring ground water levels, and water sampling practices and techniques. Examinations for natural resources ground water technicians shall examine the knowledge of the applicant regarding inspection of chemigation systems, measuring and recording static water levels, inspecting and servicing flow meters, and water sampling practices and techniques. All other examinations shall be designed and adopted to examine the knowledge of the applicant regarding the minimum standards for water wells and water well pumps, the geological characteristics of the state, current drilling or pump installation practices and techniques, and such other knowledge as deemed appropriate by the board.

(2) An examinee who fails to pass the initial examination may retake such examination without charge at any regularly scheduled examination held within twelve months after failing to pass the initial examination, except that when a national standardized examination is utilized which requires the payment of a fee to purchase such examination, the board shall require the applicant to pay the appropriate examination fee whether an initial examination or a retake of an examination is involved.

(3) In cases of hardship, the board may provide and direct that special arrangements for administering examinations be utilized. The board may also provide for temporary hardship licensing without examination due to the death of the current license holder or for other good cause shown.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 23;

Laws 1991, LB 51, § 21;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 43;

Laws 2001, LB 133, § 8;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1159.